Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1391.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Reimbursement for Custom-Fabricated Devices, Custom-Fitted Devices, Orthosis, Orthotics, Over-the-Counter Prostheses, Orthoses and Pedorthic Devices, Prefabricated Orthoses, Prostheses, Prosthetics and Components of Such 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 Devices.--(a) Except to the extent coverage is provided under another policy, an individual or group health, sickness and accident insurance policy, group health insurance plan or policy or any other form of a managed or capitated care plan, policy, subscriber contract or certificate, issued by an insurer subject to 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations), the act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act," or this act, which provides hospital or medical and surgical coverage, shall provide coverage for custom-fabricated devices, custom-fitted devices, orthosis, orthotics, over-the-counter prostheses, orthoses and pedorthic devices, prefabricated orthoses, prostheses, prosthetics and components of such devices, when prescribed by a physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant legally authorized to issue the prescription. Prior to the initial prosthetic, orthotic, pedorthic or orthotic fitting authorized under this section, a prosthetist, orthotist, pedorthist or orthotics fitter shall have the following duties:(1) Ensure that the patient has obtained a prescription, accompanied by clinical notes for treatment, from a physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant. The prescription may impose conditions and restrictions on the course of treatment as required by sound medical practice.(2) Verify that the patient has undergone a medical diagnostic examination or that the results of a recently performed medical diagnostic examination have been reviewed by a physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner, 20250HB1391PN1586 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or physician assistant.(3) Retain in the patient's file a copy of the prescription and the results of the medical diagnostic examination.(b) The benefits specified under this section may be provided through a combination of policies, contracts, certificates or riders, including major medical contracts, and shall be recognized within this Commonwealth.(c) The following shall apply:(1) An insurer may require preauthorization to determine the medical necessity and eligibility of benefits for custom-fabricated devices, custom-fitted devices, orthosis, orthotics, over-the-counter prostheses, orthoses and pedorthic devices, prefabricated orthoses, prostheses, prosthetics and components of such devices.(2) Coverage under this section shall extend to the fitting, repair or replacement of custom-fabricated devices, custom-fitted devices, orthosis, orthotics, over-the-counter prostheses, orthoses and pedorthic devices, prefabricated orthoses, prostheses, prosthetics and components of such devices, when the fitting, repair or replacement is deemed medically necessary. Coverage under this section shall not be provided for the fitting, repair or replacement necessitated by negligence in proper care and maintenance or by an abusive act committed by the individual utilizing such devices or components.(3) An insurer shall require that custom-fabricated devices, custom-fitted devices, orthosis, orthotics, over-the-counter prostheses, orthoses and pedorthic devices, prefabricated orthoses, prostheses, prosthetics and components of such devices be rendered by an orthotic fitter, orthotist, pedorthist, 20250HB1391PN1586 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 podiatrist or prosthetist licensed in this Commonwealth and contracted with the insurer, and that such devices and components be provided by an orthotic fitter, orthotist, pedorthist, podiatrist or prosthetist licensed in this Commonwealth and contracted with the insurer.(4) Coverage under this section shall be required for a prosthetic, orthotic, pedorthic or orthotic fitting device designed exclusively for recreational, organized or adaptive sports purposes.(5) Coverage under this section shall remain subject to any copayment, coinsurance or deductible amounts imposed by an insurer subject to this section for similar coverages under the same policy or contract.(d) On and after the effective date of this section, Medicaid and a contracted insurer shall reimburse for custom-fabricated devices, custom-fitted devices, orthosis, orthotics, over-the-counter prostheses, orthoses and pedorthic devices, prefabricated orthoses, prostheses, prosthetics and components of such devices at the rate of reimbursement established for such devices and components under the Federal Medicare reimbursement schedule.(e) A physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant that prescribes custom-fabricated devices, custom-fitted devices, orthosis, orthotics, over-the-counter prostheses, orthoses and pedorthic devices, prefabricated orthoses, prostheses, prosthetics and components of such devices shall document the medical necessity of the prescription as the proposed course of treatment.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless 20250HB1391PN1586 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Custom-fabricated device" means a prosthesis, orthosis or pedorthic device fabricated to comprehensive measurements or a mold for use by a patient in accordance with a prescription, which requires substantial clinical and technical judgment in its design, fabrication and fitting."Custom-fitted device" means a prefabricated prosthesis, orthosis or pedorthic device sized or modified for use by a patient in accordance with a prescription, which requires substantial clinical judgment and substantive alteration in its design for appropriate use."Orthosis" means a custom-fabricated or custom-fitted device designed to externally provide support, alignment or prevention to the body or a limb for the purpose of correcting or alleviating a neuromuscular or musculoskeletal disease, injury or deformity."Orthotic fitter" means an individual licensed in this Commonwealth to properly fit, dispense and adjust prefabricated orthotic devices as authorized by a prescription from a physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant."Orthotics" means the practice of evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, adjusting or servicing an orthosis for the correction or alleviation of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury or deformity."Orthotist" means an individual, other than a physical therapist, occupational therapist or orthotic fitter, licensed in this Commonwealth to practice orthotics as authorized by a prescription from a physician, podiatrist, certified registered 20250HB1391PN1586 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nurse practitioner or physician assistant."Over-the-counter prostheses, orthoses and pedorthic devices" means prefabricated, mass-produced items that are prepackaged and require no professional advice or judgment in size selection or use, including fabric or elastic supports, corsets, generic arch supports and elastic hose."Pedorthic device" means therapeutic shoes, shoe modifications made for therapeutic purposes, partial foot prostheses, foot orthoses and below-the-knee pedorthic modalities. The term does not include nontherapeutic, accommodative inlays, nontherapeutic accommodative footwear, unmodified, nontherapeutic over-the-counter shoes or prefabricated unmodified or unmodifiable foot care and footwear products."Pedorthics" means the practice of evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, adjusting or servicing necessary to accomplish the application of a pedorthic device for the prevention or amelioration of painful or disabling conditions related to the lower extremities."Pedorthist" means an individual licensed in this Commonwealth to practice pedorthics as authorized by prescription from a physician, podiatrist certified as a registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant."Podiatrist" means an individual licensed under the act of March 2, 1956 (1955 P.L.1206, No.375), known as the "Podiatry Practice Act," to practice podiatry."Prefabricated orthosis" means a brace or support designed to provide for alignment, correction or prevention of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury or deformity. The term does not include fabric or elastic supports, corsets, 20250HB1391PN1586 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 arch supports, low-temperature plastic splints, trusses, elastic hose, canes, crutches, soft cervical collars, dental appliances or other similar devices carried in stock and sold as over-the-counter items by a drug store, department store, corset shop or surgical supply facility."Prosthesis" means a custom-designed, custom-fabricated, custom-fitted or custom-modified device to replace an absent external limb for purposes of restoring physiological function, which is not surgically implanted. The term does not include artificial eyes, ears, fingers, toes, dental appliances, cosmetic devices, such as artificial breasts, eyelashes or wigs, or other devices that do not significantly impact the musculoskeletal functions of the body."Prosthetics" means the practice of evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, adjusting or servicing a prosthesis."Prosthetist" means an individual, other than a physical therapist or occupational therapist, licensed in this Commonwealth to practice prosthetics as authorized under prescription from a physician, podiatrist, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply 20250HB1391PN1586 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. If a State plan amendment or Federal waiver necessary for the provisions of this act is approved or is not necessary, the Secretary of Human Services shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1391PN1586 - 8 - 12345678